Florida, session 2026, HB4057.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The Board of Trustees of the Internal
Improvement Trust Fund shall convey to the City Council of the
City of DeFuniak Springs, in fee simple, and for all uses as
permitted by law, the following described real property located
in Walton County and more particularly described as follows:

Commence at a point on the North R/W line of Burdick
Avenue, being 37.5 feet from centerline, and the East R/W
line of 11th Street as exists on 11/8/2000 and run N
89°35'12" E along said R/W line 137.5 feet to the point of
beginning, thence run N 00°00'00" E 677.49 feet to the
South R/W line of Government Street being 37.5 feet from
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4057 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4057 2026 Legislature
centerline, thence run S 80°51'39" E along said line 156.11
feet to the West R/W line of 10th Street being 37.5 feet
from centerline, thence run S 06°40'03" W along said line
161.10 feet, thence continue S 00°54'09" W along said R/W
line 490.83 feet to the North R/W line of Burdick Avenue,
thence run S 89°35'12" W 127.70 feet to the point of
beginning. Containing 2.1 acres being a part of Block 1620,
1629, & 1630 City of DeFuniak Springs, Florida.
TOGETHER WITH: Commence at a point on the North R/W line of
Burdick Avenue, being 37.5 feet from centerline, and the
East R/W line of 11th Street as exists on 11/8/2000, thence
run N 89°35'12" E along said R/W line 340.20 feet to the
point of beginning, said point being on the East R/W line
of 10th Street, thence run N 00°51'27" E along said R/W
line of 10th Street, 481.57, thence continue N 06°40'03" E
along said line 159.34 feet to the South R/W line of
Government Street being 37.5 feet from centerline, thence
run S 83°03'15" E 20.77 feet, thence continue N 88°15'33" E
295.41 feet to the West R/W line of Highway 83, thence run
S 00°45'10" E 643.74 feet to the North R/W line of Burdick
Avenue, thence run S 89°35'12" W 350.07 feet to the point
of beginning, containing 5.0 acres and being a part of
Blocks 1629 & 1630 City of DeFuniak Springs, Florida.
LESS AND EXCEPT: A parcel of land lying in Section 26,
Township 3 North, Range 19 West, Walton County, Florida,
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4057 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4057 2026 Legislature
being more particularly described as follows: Commence at
the intersection of the North right of way line of Burdick
Avenue, and the East right of way line of 11th Street;
thence proceed South 84 degrees 23 minutes 55 seconds East,
along said North right of way line of Burdick Avenue, for a
distance of 137.50 feet to the point of beginning; thence
leaving said North right of way line, proceed North 06
degrees 00 minutes 54 seconds East, for a distance of
190.35 feet; thence proceed South 81 degrees 35 minutes 36
seconds East, for a distance of 130.71 feet to a point on
the West right of way line of 10th Street; thence proceed
South 06 degrees 55 minutes 02 seconds West, along said
West right of way line of 10th Street, for a distance of
184.00 feet to a point on the aforesaid North right of way
line of Burdick Avenue; thence leaving said West right of
way line, proceed North 84 degrees 23 minutes 55 seconds
West, along said North right of way line of Burdick Avenue,
for a distance of 127.70 feet to the point of beginning.
Less and except all sovereignty lands.
Section 2. (1) The City Council of the City of DeFuniak
Springs shall manage and protect the real property described in
section 1, and use the property continuously for recreational,
governmental, public safety, and community means and purposes.
(2) Any sale or disposition of the real property described
in section 1 by the City Council of the City of DeFuniak Springs
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4057 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 4057 2026 Legislature
will result in ownership of the property reverting back to the
Board of Trustees of the Internal Improvement Trust Fund on
behalf of the state.
Section 3. The Board of Trustees of the Internal
Improvement Trust Fund shall convey the real property described
in section 1 to the City Council of the City of DeFuniak Springs
within 90 days after the effective date of this act.
Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4057 -02-er